Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2018
50-506
Water Funding Task Force; consultation
with other groups; meetings; consultant; termination.

(1) The Water Funding Task Force may consult
with other groups in its work, including, but not limited to, the University
of Nebraska, the Department of Environmental Quality, the Game and Parks Commission,
the United States Army Corps of Engineers, the United States Geological Survey,
the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, the United States Bureau of Reclamation,
and the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United States Department
of Agriculture.

(2) For administrative
and budgetary purposes, the task force shall be housed within the Department
of Natural Resources. Additional advisory support may be requested from appropriate
federal and state agencies.

(3) The task force may meet as necessary and may hire a consultant
or consultants to facilitate the work and meetings of the task force and enter
into agreements to achieve the objectives of the task force. The task force
may create and use working groups or subcommittees as it deems necessary.
Any contracts or agreements entered into under this subsection shall not be
subject to the Nebraska Consultants' Competitive Negotiation Act or sections
73-301 to 73-306 or 73-501 to 73-510.

(4) The Water Funding Task Force terminates
on December 31, 2013.

Laws 2013, LB517, § 3.

Nebraska Consultants' Competitive Negotiation Act, see section 81-1702.